District of Columbia statutes.
47-2839.01

Security agencies.

(a)

For the purpose of this section, the term:

(1)

“Campus police officer” means an individual appointed under § 5-129.02, and subject to the requirements of Chapter 12 of Title 6A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regualtions [Regulations].

(2)

“Security agency” means a person who conducts a business that provides security services.

(3)

“Security officer” means an individual appointed under § 5-129.02, and shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2100 of Title 17 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

(4)

“Security services” means any activity that is performed for compensation by a security officer or special police officer to protect an individual or property.

(5)

“Special police officer” means an individual appointed under § 5-129.02, and subject to the requirements of Chapter 11 of Title 6A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of operating, managing, or conducting a security agency, for profit or gain, or to advertise or represent his or her business to be that of a security agency, or that of conducting, managing, or operating a security agency, without first obtaining a license to do so.

(c)

A person who violates any provision of this section, or the provisions of Chapter 21 of Title 17 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations pertaining to security agencies, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

(d)

(1)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

(2)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(e)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Safety endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

(f)

All license fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Occupations and Professions Licensing Special Account established pursuant to § 47-2853.11.

History

Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-187, § 203(b), 53 DCR 6722
Mar 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 127(a), 56 DCR 1117
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(r), 60 DCR 2064
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3012(b), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-551.02 and § 47-2853.11.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 47-2839a.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $1,000” in (c).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (f).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(r) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 3011 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle B of Title III of the act may be cited the “Security Licensing Streamlining Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Former § 47-2839a has been recodified as § 47-2839.01 by D.C. Law 17-353, § 127(a).

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.